test/src/morphology/N-pan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pan: # Noun 100 'eng /est pann/fin' - full paradigm
     pan+N+Sg+Nom: pan
     pan+N+Sg+Gen: pan
     pan+N+Sg+Par: pannõ
     pan+N+Sg+Dat: pannõn
     pan+N+Sg+Ins: pannõks
     pan+N+Sg+Ill: pannõ
     pan+N+Sg+Ela: panstõ
     pan+N+Pl+Nom: pǭnõd
     pan+N+Pl+Gen: pǭnõd
     pan+N+Pl+Par: pǭnidi
     pan+N+Pl+Dat: pǭnõdõn
     pan+N+Pl+Ins: pǭnõdõks
     pan+N+Pl+Ill: pǭniž
     pan+N+Pl+Ela: pǭnist
